bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Дистрибуция и филтриране на вода: Вградени филтри за вода; Диспенсъри за вода; Дестилатори за вода; Аксесоари за филтриране на вода; Сол за омекотяване на вода; Омекотители за вода
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Waterdispensers en -filters: Leidingfilters; Waterdispensers; Waterdestilleerders; Waterfilteraccessoires; Zout voor waterontharding; Waterverzachters
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Točenje in filtriranje vode: Vgradni vodni filtri; Dozatorji za vodo; Destilatorji vode; Dodatki za filtriranje vode; Sol za mehčanje vode; Mehčalci vode
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Doziranje i filtriranje vode: Ugradbeni filtri za vodu; Dozatori za vodu; Destilatori za vodu; Pribor za filtriranje vode; Sol za omekšavanje vode; Omekšivači vode
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Vattenautomater och vattenfiltrering: Inline-vattenfilter; Vattenautomater; Vattendestillatorer; Tillbehör till vattenfiltrering; Vattenmjukgöringssalt; Vattenmjukgörare
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Distribuirea și filtrarea apei: Filtre de apă montate pe conductă; Dozatoare de apă; Distilatoare pentru apă; Accesorii pentru filtrarea apei; Sare de dedurizare a apei; Agenți de dedurizare a apei
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Water Dispensing & Filtration: In-Line Water Filters; Water Dispensers; Water Distillers; Water Filtration Accessories; Water Softener Salt; Water Softeners
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Dávkovanie a filtrácia vody: Sieťové vodné filtre; Dávkovače vody; Destilátory vody; Príslušenstvo na filtráciu vody; Soľ na zmäkčenie vody; Zmäkčovače vody
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Vandens dozavimas ir filtravimas: Linijiniai vandens filtrai; Vandens dozatoriai; Vandens distiliavimo įrenginiai; Vandens filtravimo priedai; Vandens minkštinimo druska; Vandens minkštikliai
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Distribuição e filtragem de água: Filtros de água em linha; Suportes para água; Destiladores de água; Acessórios para filtragem de água; Sal para abrandador de água; Amaciador de água
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Dystrybucja i filtrowanie wody: Filtry narurowe; Dystrybutory wody; Destylatory wody; Akcesoria do filtrowania wody; Sól do zmiękczania wody; Zmiękczacze wody
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Dávkování a filtrace vody: Vodovodní filtry; Zásobníky pitné vody; Čističe vody; Příslušenství k vodním filtrům; Sůl na změkčení vody; Změkčovače vody
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Vanndispensering og -filtrering: Rørmonterte vannfiltre; Vanndispensere; Vanndestillatorer; Tilbehør for vannfiltrering; Vannfiltreringssalg; Vannmyknere
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízadagolás és szűrés: Beépített vízszűrők; Vízadagolók; Vízlepárlók; Vízszűrési kiegészítők; Vízlágyító só; Vízlágyítók
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Distribution et filtration de l’eau: Filtres à eau en ligne; Distributeurs d’eau fraîche; Distillateurs d’eau; Accessoires de filtration de l’eau; Sel pour adoucisseur d’eau; Adoucisseurs d’eau
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Distribuzione/filtro acqua: Filtri acqua integrati; Distributori d'acqua; Distillatori acqua; Accessori per filtro acqua; Sale anticalcare; Addolcitori
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Trinkwasserspender & Filter: Wasserleitungsfilter; Wasserspender; Wasserdestillationsgeräte; Zubehör für Wasserfilter; Salz zur Wasserenthärtung; Wasserenthärter
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Veden käyttöautomaatit ja suodatus: Vesisuodattimet; Vesiautomaatit; Vedensuodattimet; Vedensuodatustarvikkeet; Vedenpehmennyssuola; Vedenpehmennysaineet
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > ウォーターサーバー・浄水器: インラインフィルター; ウォーターサーバー; 蒸留式浄水器; 浄水器関連用品; 軟水器用塩; 軟水器
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Συσκευές διανομής & φιλτραρίσματος νερού: Ενσωματωμένα φίλτρα νερού; Διανομείς νερού; Αποστακτήρες νερού; Αξεσουάρ φιλτραρίσματος νερού; Αλάτι για παρασκευάσματα αποσκλήρυνσης νερού; Παρασκευάσματα αποσκλήρυνσης νερού
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Lọc và phân phối nước: Bộ lọc nước tại vòi; Máy nước nóng lạnh; Máy cất nước; Phụ kiện lọc nước; Muối làm mềm nước; Thiết bị làm mềm nước
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Distribuição e filtragem de água: Filtros de água In-Line; Distribuidores de água; Destiladores de água; Acessórios de filtragem de água; Abrandadores de sais de água; Abrandadores de água
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Su Dağıtım ve Arıtma Sistemleri: Şebeke Girişine Takılan Su Arıtma Filtreleri; Su Sebilleri; Su Damıtıcılar; Su Arıtma Cihazı Aksesuarları; Su Yumuşatıcı Tuzu; Su Yumuşatıcılar
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 급수/정수: 인라인 정수 필터; 정수기; 증류기; 정수 필터 부대용품; 연수용 소금; 연수기
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Filtración y distribución de agua: Filtros de agua en línea; Dispensadores de agua; Destiladores de agua; Accesorios para filtro de agua; Sal para descalcificadores de agua; Descalcificadores
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Vanddispensere og filtrering: Indbyggede vandfiltre; Vanddispenser; Vanddestillationsapparater; Vandfiltrering – tilbehør; Vandblødgører – salt; Vandblødgørere
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 饮水机与净水器: 前置管道净水器; 饮水机; 蒸馏水器; 净水器配件; 软水盐; 软水器
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Фильтрация и подача воды: Проточные фильтры для воды; Диспенсеры для воды; Опреснители; Аксессуары для фильтров воды; Соль для умягчителей воды; Умягчители воды
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 用水配送和過濾: 前置過濾器; 飲水機; 水蒸餾器; 濾水配件; 軟水專用鹽; 軟水劑
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > การจ่ายและกรองน้ำ: ตัวกรองน้ำอินไลน์; เครื่องจ่ายน้ำ; เครื่องกลั่นน้ำ; อุปกรณ์กรองน้ำ; เกลือที่ทำให้น้ำกระด้างน้อยลง; เครื่องลดความกระด้างของน้ำ